Utah statutes.
58-73-502.   Unlawful conduct -- Penalties.

(1)  "Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501:

(a)  buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining any chiropractic diploma, license, certificate, or registration;

(b)  aiding or abetting the buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining of any chiropractic diploma, license, certificate, or registration; and

(c)  substantially interfering with a licensee's lawful and competent practice of chiropractic in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  Any person who violates any provision of Subsection (1) is guilty of a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 284, 1998 General Session

